Arkansas, session 2025, SB425.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2309 is amended to read as follows:
6-20-2309. Enhanced transportation funding.
(a) For the 2023-2024 2025-2026 school year, in addition to the
foundation funding provided to a school district under § 6-20-2305(a)(2), the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall distribute enhanced
transportation funding to school districts each school year in the following
amounts:
101000 DEWITT SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $8,790.15
104000 STUTTGART SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
201000 CROSSETT SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
203000 HAMBURG SCHOOL DISTRICT $58,389 $65,642.42
302000 COTTER SCHOOL DISTRICT $23,781 $7,228.44
303000 MOUNTAIN HOME SCHOOL DISTRICT $32,816 $34,690.87
304000 NORFORK SCHOOL DISTRICT $99,947 $77,708.13
401000 BENTONVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
*TNL281*
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
402000 DECATUR SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
403000 GENTRY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
404000 GRAVETTE SCHOOL DISTRICT $31,928 $0
405000 ROGERS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
406000 SILOAM SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
407000 PEA RIDGE SCHOOL DISTRICT $23,360 $20,477.37
501000 ALPENA SCHOOL DISTRICT $76,047 $81,964.60
502000 BERGMAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $22,642 $31,413.75
503000 HARRISON SCHOOL DISTRICT $3,784 $0
504000 OMAHA SCHOOL DISTRICT $58,586 $10,385.50
505000 VALLEY SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $22,050 $0
506000 LEAD HILL SCHOOL DISTRICT $144,133 $184,081.72
601000 HERMITAGE SCHOOL DISTRICT $42,459 $195,153.76
602000 WARREN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $28,835.83
701000 HAMPTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $72,585 $22,909.75
801000 BERRYVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $16,887 $12,374.82
802000 EUREKA SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
803000 GREEN FOREST SCHOOL DISTRICT $30,013 $0
901000 DERMOTT SCHOOL DISTRICT $54,468 $63,501.53
903000 LAKESIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (CHICOT) $189,262 $66,760.65
1002000 ARKADELPHIA SCHOOL DISTRICT $59,723 $68,963.30
1003000 GURDON SCHOOL DISTRICT $79,557 $27,015.49
1101000 CORNING SCHOOL DISTRICT $109,554 $65,541.48
1104000 PIGGOTT SCHOOL DISTRICT $1 $21,656.49
1106000 RECTOR SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1201000 CONCORD SCHOOL DISTRICT $94,418 $108,600.55
1202000 HEBER SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $77,734 $29,693.98
1203000 QUITMAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1204000 WEST SIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (CLEBURNE) $0
1304000 WOODLAWN SCHOOL DISTRICT $32,021 $6,270.67
1305000 CLEVELAND COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $25,462 $46,320.46
1402000 MAGNOLIA SCHOOL DISTRICT $56,484 $49,578.33
1408000 EMERSON-TAYLOR-BRADLEY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1503000 NEMO VISTA SCHOOL DISTRICT $76,720 $80,354.57
1505000 WONDERVIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $50,521 $69,224.63
1507000 SOUTH CONWAY COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $22,036 $24,512.04
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
1601000 BAY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $712.22
1602000 WESTSIDE CONS. SCH. DISTRICT (CRAIGHEAD) $0 $18,605.78
1603000 BROOKLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1605000 BUFFALO IS. CENTRAL SCH. DISTRICT $0 $3,338.84
1608000 JONESBORO SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $5,851.07
1611000 NETTLETON SCHOOL DISTRICT $18,472 $7,137.40
1612000 VALLEY VIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1613000 RIVERSIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT $57,101 $44,481.86
1701000 ALMA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1702000 CEDARVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $61,928 $23,542.70
1703000 MOUNTAINBURG SCHOOL DISTRICT $95,955 $73,633.19
1704000 MULBERRY PVB SCHOOL DISTRICT $45,350 $33,678.45
1705000 VAN BUREN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1802000 EARLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $8,668 $17,225.20
1803000 WEST MEMPHIS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1804000 MARION SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1901000 CROSS COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $39,141 $34,180.91
1905000 WYNNE SCHOOL DISTRICT $10,348 $15,096.93
2002000 FORDYCE SCHOOL DISTRICT $31,141 $29,464.08
2104000 DUMAS SCHOOL DISTRICT $16,495 $51,795.99
2105000 MCGEHEE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2202000 DREW CENTRAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $90,256 $103,299.87
2203000 MONTICELLO SCHOOL DISTRICT $20,619 $0
2301000 CONWAY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $490.23
2303000 GREENBRIER SCHOOL DISTRICT $5,657 $767.16
2304000 GUY-PERKINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $89,847 $6,674.99
2305000 MAYFLOWER SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $14,807.93
2306000 MT. VERNON/ENOLA SCHOOL DISTRICT $44,712 $57,705.51
2307000 VILONIA SCHOOL DISTRICT $78,746 $7,175.07
2402000 CHARLESTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2403000 COUNTY LINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $110,305 $118,411.60
2404000 OZARK SCHOOL DISTRICT $38,440 $23,183.97
2501000 MAMMOTH SPRING SCHOOL DISTRICT $108,982 $159,664.46
2502000 SALEM SCHOOL DISTRICT $152,071 $157,792.57
2503000 VIOLA SCHOOL DISTRICT $94,897 $12,438.38
2601000 CUTTER-MORNING STAR SCHOOL DISTRICT $18,367 $8,080.47
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
2602000 FOUNTAIN LAKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2603000 HOT SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2604000 JESSIEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $3,664 $0
2605000 LAKE HAMILTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $32,202 $10,505.00
2606000 LAKESIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (GARLAND) $0
2607000 MOUNTAIN PINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $46,343 $57,178.09
2703000 POYEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2705000 SHERIDAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $61,406 $52,576.71
2803000 MARMADUKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $7,080 $10,563.18
2807000 GREENE COUNTY TECH SCHOOL DISTRICT $63,860 $32,418.68
2808000 PARAGOULD SCHOOL DISTRICT $13,644 $19,224.72
2901000 BLEVINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $94,816 $90,400.96
2903000 HOPE SCHOOL DISTRICT $8,950 $32,927.03
2906000 SPRING HILL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $39,308.25
3001000 BISMARCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $76,773 $64,094.32
3002000 GLEN ROSE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3003000 MAGNET COVE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3004000 MALVERN SCHOOL DISTRICT $14,924 $0
3005000 OUACHITA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3102000 DIERKS SCHOOL DISTRICT $81,223 $124,768.88
3104000 MINERAL SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3105000 NASHVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $63,430 $69,159.74
3201000 BATESVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $13,357.20
3209000 SOUTHSIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (INDEPENDENCE) $78,015 $124,524.97
3211000 MIDLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $72,171 $42,758.21
3212000 CEDAR RIDGE SCHOOL DISTRICT $41,898 $81,942.69
3301000 CALICO ROCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $32,929 $4,104.31
3302000 MELBOURNE SCHOOL DISTRICT $50,733 $53,949.74
3306000 IZARD COUNTY CONSOLIDATED SCHOOL DISTRICT $140,727 $178,006.69
3403000 NEWPORT SCHOOL DISTRICT $43,991 $13,804.09
3405000 JACKSON CO. SCHOOL DISTRICT $69,675 $100,407.75
3505000 PINE BLUFF SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3509000 WATSON CHAPEL SCHOOL DISTRICT $37,568 $87,231.01
3510000 WHITE HALL SCHOOL DISTRICT $28,448 $84,823.23
3601000 CLARKSVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $3,960.78
3604000 LAMAR SCHOOL DISTRICT $27,762 $0
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
3606000 WESTSIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (JOHNSON) $23,236 $21,072.42
3704000 LAFAYETTE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $51,990 $46,221.89
3804000 HOXIE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $48,039.47
3806000 SLOAN-HENDRIX SCHOOL DISTRICT $26,682 $102,137.54
3809000 HILLCREST SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3810000 LAWRENCE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $58,135 $0
3840700 IMBODEN CHARTER SCHOOL DISTRICT $20,427 $38,366.62
3904000 LEE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $84,629 $64,693.15
4003000 STAR CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $47,594 $80,737.64
4101000 ASHDOWN SCHOOL DISTRICT $64,260 $77,011.16
4102000 FOREMAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $69,441 $114,127.76
4201000 BOONEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $25,411 $52,292.55
4202000 MAGAZINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $41,459 $87,862.72
4203000 PARIS SCHOOL DISTRICT $39,013 $38,496.18
4204000 SCRANTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $76,713 $77,364.85
4301000 LONOKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $4,513.92
4302000 ENGLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4303000 CARLISLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4304000 CABOT SCHOOL DISTRICT $8,470 $12,368.36
4401000 HUNTSVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $17,601 $41,531.28
4501000 FLIPPIN SCHOOL DISTRICT $58,929 $118,479.01
4502000 YELLVILLE-SUMMIT SCHOOL DISTRICT $67,514 $0
4602000 GENOA CENTRAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $24,365 $36,172.69
4603000 FOUKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $49,397 $39,642.38
4605000 TEXARKANA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4701000 ARMOREL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4702000 BLYTHEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4706000 RIVERCREST SCHOOL DISTRICT $42,783 $36,976.18
4708000 GOSNELL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4712000 MANILA SCHOOL DISTRICT $35,793 $51,504.12
4713000 OSCEOLA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4801000 BRINKLEY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4802000 CLARENDON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4901000 CADDO HILLS SCHOOL DISTRICT $166,376 $193,313.13
4902000 MOUNT IDA SCHOOL DISTRICT $57,998 $0
5006000 PRESCOTT SCHOOL DISTRICT $4,405 $33,089.16
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
5008000 NEVADA SCHOOL DISTRICT $107,515 $100,549.59
5102000 JASPER SCHOOL DISTRICT $6,990 $0
5106000 DEER/MT. JUDEA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5201000 BEARDEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $16,209 $68,670.47
5204000 CAMDEN FAIRVIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $126,570 $104,887.92
5205000 HARMONY GROVE SCHOOL DISTRICT (OUACHITA) $0 $110,193.05
5301000 EAST END SCHOOL DISTRICT $1,758 $61,980.21
5303000 PERRYVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $81,275 $90,575.91
5401000 BARTON-LEXA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5403000 HELENA/W. HELENA SCHOOL DISTRICT $22,857 $41,402.16
5404000 MARVELL-ELAINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $36,038.45
5502000 CENTERPOINT SCHOOL DISTRICT $90,255 $70,323.98
5503000 KIRBY SCHOOL DISTRICT $116,506 $139,250.59
5504000 SOUTH PIKE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $53,203 $88,800.46
5602000 HARRISBURG SCHOOL DISTRICT $42,777 $6,735.59
5604000 MARKED TREE SCHOOL DISTRICT $22,342 $8,376.17
5605000 TRUMANN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5608000 EAST POINSETT CO. SCHOOL DISTRICT $34,400 $29,667.47
5703000 MENA SCHOOL DISTRICT $44,348 $39,446.04
5706000 OUACHITA RIVER SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5707000 COSSATOT RIVER SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $19,595.91
5801000 ATKINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5802000 DOVER SCHOOL DISTRICT $7,587 $0
5803000 HECTOR SCHOOL DISTRICT $160,595 $151,248.40
5804000 POTTSVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $9,707 $15,354.39
5805000 RUSSELLVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5901000 DES ARC SCHOOL DISTRICT $82,428 $82,937.67
5903000 HAZEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $57,611 $40,300.38
6001000 LITTLE ROCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $16,246 $30,123.42
6002000 N. LITTLE ROCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6003000 PULASKI COUNTY SPECIAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6004000 JACKSONVILLE NORTH PULASKI SCHOOL DISTRICT $46,721 $17,459.85
6102000 MAYNARD SCHOOL DISTRICT $86,133 $61,790.34
6103000 POCAHONTAS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $17,454.64
6201000 FORREST CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6205000 PALESTINE-WHEATLEY SCH. DISTRICT $0
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
6301000 BAUXITE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $50,390.07
6302000 BENTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6303000 BRYANT SCHOOL DISTRICT $18,873 $21,850.80
6304000 HARMONY GROVE SCH. DISTRICT (SALINE) $0
6401000 WALDRON SCHOOL DISTRICT $3,036 $0
6502000 SEARCY COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6505000 OZARK MOUNTAIN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6601000 FORT SMITH SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6602000 GREENWOOD SCHOOL DISTRICT $2,412 $3,858.38
6603000 HACKETT SCHOOL DISTRICT $64,497 $70,632.72
6605000 LAVACA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6606000 MANSFIELD SCHOOL DISTRICT $12,435 $1,850.86
6701000 DE QUEEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $43,061 $59,911.60
6703000 HORATIO SCHOOL DISTRICT $112,424 $108,668.48
6802000 CAVE CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $170,524 $122,888.93
6804000 HIGHLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $15,872 $30,681.89
6901000 MOUNTAIN VIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $21,599 $0
7001000 EL DORADO SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7003000 JUNCTION CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $77,751 $31,696.82
7007000 PARKERS CHAPEL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $16,741.98
7008000 SMACKOVER-NORPHLET SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7009000 STRONG-HUTTIG SCHOOL DISTRICT $61,279 $15,830.33
7102000 CLINTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $39,142 $79,675.87
7104000 SHIRLEY SCHOOL DISTRICT $46,947 $10,906.07
7105000 SOUTH SIDE SCH. DISTRICT (VAN BUREN) $0
7201000 ELKINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $35,526 $53,013.91
7202000 FARMINGTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7203000 FAYETTEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7204000 GREENLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $13,352 $0
7205000 LINCOLN CONSOLIDATED SCHOOL DISTRICT $29,494 $48,898.85
7206000 PRAIRIE GROVE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $23,917.73
7207000 SPRINGDALE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7208000 WEST FORK SCHOOL DISTRICT $35,596 $26,446.30
7301000 BALD KNOB SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7302000 BEEBE SCHOOL DISTRICT $15,028 $7,276.02
7303000 BRADFORD SCHOOL DISTRICT $41,270 $23,810.23
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
7304000 WHITE CO. CENTRAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $12,488 $17,630.93
7307000 RIVERVIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $4,076 $0
7309000 PANGBURN SCHOOL DISTRICT $78,498 $73,396.72
7310000 ROSE BUD SCHOOL DISTRICT $102,719 $132,911.41
7311000 SEARCY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7401000 AUGUSTA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7403000 MCCRORY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7503000 DANVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7504000 DARDANELLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $5,055 $27,379.79
7509000 WESTERN YELL CO. SCHOOL DISTRICT $40,841 $26,695.61
7510000 TWO RIVERS SCHOOL DISTRICT $82,448 $52,743.46
0440700 ARKANSAS ARTS ACADEMY $0
0442700 FOUNDERS CLASSICAL ACADEMIES OF ARKANSAS $0
0444700 ARKANSAS CONNECTIONS ACADEMY $0
0445700 HOPE ACADEMY OF NORTHWEST ARKANSAS $0
3544700 FRIENDSHIP ASPIRE ACADEMY PINE BLUFF $0
3545700 FRIENDSHIP ASPIRE ACADEMY SOUTHEAST PINE BLUFF $0
5440700 KIPP DELTA PUBLIC SCHOOLS $0 $80,232.67
6040700 ACADEMICS PLUS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS $0
6041700 LISA ACADEMY $0
6043700 ARKANSAS VIRTUAL ACADEMY $0
6047700 ESTEM PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL $0
6050700 ARKANSAS LIGHTHOUSE ACADEMIES $0
6052700 GRADUATE ARKANSAS CHARTER $0
6053700 RESPONSIVE ED SOLUTIONS PREMIER HIGH SCHOOL OF LITTLE ROCK $0
6055700 EXALT ACADEMY OF SOUTHWEST LITTLE ROCK $0
6060700 SCHOLARMADE ACHIEVEMENT PLACE OF AKANSAS $0
6061700 FRIENDSHIP ASPIRE ACADEMY LITTLE ROCK $0
6062700 RESPONSIVE ED SOLUTIONS PREMIER HIGH SCHOOL OF N. LITTLE ROCK $0
6063700 WESTWIND SCHOOL FOR PERFORMING ARTS $0
6640700 FUTURE SCHOOL OF FORT SMITH $0
7240700 HAAS HALL ACADEMY $0
7242700 RESPONSIVE ED SOLUTIONS PREMIER HIGH SCHOOL OF SPRINGDALE $0
6064700 ARKANSAS MILITARY AND FIRST RESPONDERS ACADEMY (AMFRA) $0
(b) For the 2024-2025 2026-2027 school year and each school year
thereafter, in addition to the foundation funding provided to a school
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
district under § 6-20-2305(a)(2), the division shall distribute enhanced
transportation funding to school districts each school year in the following
amounts:
101000 DEWITT SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $8,790.15
104000 STUTTGART SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
201000 CROSSETT SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
203000 HAMBURG SCHOOL DISTRICT $61,023 $65,642.42
302000 COTTER SCHOOL DISTRICT $24,854 $7,228.44
303000 MOUNTAIN HOME SCHOOL DISTRICT $34,296 $34,690.87
304000 NORFORK SCHOOL DISTRICT $104,456 $77,708.13
401000 BENTONVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
402000 DECATUR SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
403000 GENTRY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
404000 GRAVETTE SCHOOL DISTRICT $33,368 $0
405000 ROGERS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
406000 SILOAM SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
407000 PEA RIDGE SCHOOL DISTRICT $24,414 $20,477.37
501000 ALPENA SCHOOL DISTRICT $79,478 $81,964.60
502000 BERGMAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $23,663 $31,413.75
503000 HARRISON SCHOOL DISTRICT $3,955 $0
504000 OMAHA SCHOOL DISTRICT $61,229 $10,385.50
505000 VALLEY SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $23,044 $0
506000 LEAD HILL SCHOOL DISTRICT $150,635 $184,081.72
601000 HERMITAGE SCHOOL DISTRICT $44,375 $195,153.76
602000 WARREN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $28,835.83
701000 HAMPTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $75,859 $22,909.75
801000 BERRYVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $17,649 $12,374.82
802000 EUREKA SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
803000 GREEN FOREST SCHOOL DISTRICT $31,367 $0
901000 DERMOTT SCHOOL DISTRICT $56,925 $63,501.53
903000 LAKESIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (CHICOT) $197,800 $66,760.65
1002000 ARKADELPHIA SCHOOL DISTRICT $62,418 $68,963.30
1003000 GURDON SCHOOL DISTRICT $79,557 $27,015.49
1101000 CORNING SCHOOL DISTRICT $114,497 $65,541.48
1104000 PIGGOTT SCHOOL DISTRICT $1 $21,656.49
1106000 RECTOR SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
1201000 CONCORD SCHOOL DISTRICT $98,677 $108,600.55
1202000 HEBER SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $77,734 $29,693.98
1203000 QUITMAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1204000 WEST SIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (CLEBURNE) $0
1304000 WOODLAWN SCHOOL DISTRICT $33,466 $6,270.67
1305000 CLEVELAND COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $26,610 $46,320.46
1402000 MAGNOLIA SCHOOL DISTRICT $59,032 $49,578.33
1408000 EMERSON-TAYLOR-BRADLEY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1503000 NEMO VISTA SCHOOL DISTRICT $80,181 $80,354.57
1505000 WONDERVIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $50,521 $69,224.63
1507000 SOUTH CONWAY COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $23,030 $24,512.04
1601000 BAY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $712.22
1602000 WESTSIDE CONS. SCH. DISTRICT (CRAIGHEAD) $0 $18,605.78
1603000 BROOKLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1605000 BUFFALO IS. CENTRAL SCH. DISTRICT $0 $3,338.84
1608000 JONESBORO SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $5,851.07
1611000 NETTLETON SCHOOL DISTRICT $19,305 $7,137.40
1612000 VALLEY VIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1613000 RIVERSIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT $59,677 $44,481.86
1701000 ALMA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1702000 CEDARVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $64,722 $23,542.70
1703000 MOUNTAINBURG SCHOOL DISTRICT $100,284 $73,633.19
1704000 MULBERRY PVB SCHOOL DISTRICT $47,396 $33,678.45
1705000 VAN BUREN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1802000 EARLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $9,059 $17,225.20
1803000 WEST MEMPHIS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1804000 MARION SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
1901000 CROSS COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $39,141 $34,180.91
1905000 WYNNE SCHOOL DISTRICT $10,348 $15,096.93
2002000 FORDYCE SCHOOL DISTRICT $32,546 $29,464.08
2104000 DUMAS SCHOOL DISTRICT $17,239 $51,795.99
2105000 MCGEHEE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2202000 DREW CENTRAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $94,328 $103,299.87
2203000 MONTICELLO SCHOOL DISTRICT $21,549 $0
2301000 CONWAY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $490.23
2303000 GREENBRIER SCHOOL DISTRICT $5,912 $767.16
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
2304000 GUY-PERKINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $89,847 $6,674.99
2305000 MAYFLOWER SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $14,807.93
2306000 MT. VERNON/ENOLA SCHOOL DISTRICT $44,712 $57,705.51
2307000 VILONIA SCHOOL DISTRICT $82,298 $7,175.07
2402000 CHARLESTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2403000 COUNTY LINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $115,281 $118,411.60
2404000 OZARK SCHOOL DISTRICT $40,174 $23,183.97
2501000 MAMMOTH SPRING SCHOOL DISTRICT $113,899 $159,664.46
2502000 SALEM SCHOOL DISTRICT $154,754 $157,792.57
2503000 VIOLA SCHOOL DISTRICT $99,178 $12,438.38
2601000 CUTTER-MORNING STAR SCHOOL DISTRICT $18,367 $8,080.47
2602000 FOUNTAIN LAKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2603000 HOT SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2604000 JESSIEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $3,830 $0
2605000 LAKE HAMILTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $33,654 $10,505.00
2606000 LAKESIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (GARLAND) $0
2607000 MOUNTAIN PINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $48,434 $57,178.09
2703000 POYEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
2705000 SHERIDAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $64,176 $52,576.71
2803000 MARMADUKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $7,400 $10,563.18
2807000 GREENE COUNTY TECH SCHOOL DISTRICT $66,741 $32,418.68
2808000 PARAGOULD SCHOOL DISTRICT $14,260 $19,224.72
2901000 BLEVINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $99,094 $90,400.96
2903000 HOPE SCHOOL DISTRICT $9,354 $32,927.03
2906000 SPRING HILL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $39,308.25
3001000 BISMARCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $80,236 $64,094.32
3002000 GLEN ROSE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3003000 MAGNET COVE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3004000 MALVERN SCHOOL DISTRICT $15,597 $0
3005000 OUACHITA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3102000 DIERKS SCHOOL DISTRICT $81,223 $124,768.88
3104000 MINERAL SPRINGS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3105000 NASHVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $66,292 $69,159.74
3201000 BATESVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $13,357.20
3209000 SOUTHSIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (INDEPENDENCE) $81,534 $124,524.97
3211000 MIDLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $75,427 $42,758.21
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
3212000 CEDAR RIDGE SCHOOL DISTRICT $43,788 $81,942.69
3301000 CALICO ROCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $34,414 $4,104.31
3302000 MELBOURNE SCHOOL DISTRICT $53,022 $53,949.74
3306000 IZARD COUNTY CONSOLIDATED SCHOOL DISTRICT $147,076 $178,006.69
3403000 NEWPORT SCHOOL DISTRICT $45,975 $13,804.09
3405000 JACKSON CO. SCHOOL DISTRICT $72,819 $100,407.75
3505000 PINE BLUFF SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3509000 WATSON CHAPEL SCHOOL DISTRICT $39,263 $87,231.01
3510000 WHITE HALL SCHOOL DISTRICT $28,448 $84,823.23
3601000 CLARKSVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $3,960.78
3604000 LAMAR SCHOOL DISTRICT $29,015 $0
3606000 WESTSIDE SCHOOL DISTRICT (JOHNSON) $24,285 $21,072.42
3704000 LAFAYETTE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $54,335 $46,221.89
3804000 HOXIE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $48,039.47
3806000 SLOAN-HENDRIX SCHOOL DISTRICT $27,885 $102,137.54
3809000 HILLCREST SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
3810000 LAWRENCE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $60,758 $0
3840700 IMBODEN CHARTER SCHOOL DISTRICT $20,427 $38,366.62
3904000 LEE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $88,447 $64,693.15
4003000 STAR CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $49,742 $80,737.64
4101000 ASHDOWN SCHOOL DISTRICT $67,159 $77,011.16
4102000 FOREMAN SCHOOL DISTRICT $69,441 $114,127.76
4201000 BOONEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $26,557 $52,292.55
4202000 MAGAZINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $41,459 $87,862.72
4203000 PARIS SCHOOL DISTRICT $40,773 $38,496.18
4204000 SCRANTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $78,896 $77,364.85
4301000 LONOKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $4,513.92
4302000 ENGLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4303000 CARLISLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4304000 CABOT SCHOOL DISTRICT $8,852 $12,368.36
4401000 HUNTSVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $18,396 $41,531.28
4501000 FLIPPIN SCHOOL DISTRICT $58,929 $118,479.01
4502000 YELLVILLE-SUMMIT SCHOOL DISTRICT $70,560 $0
4602000 GENOA CENTRAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $25,464 $36,172.69
4603000 FOUKE SCHOOL DISTRICT $51,626 $39,642.38
4605000 TEXARKANA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
4701000 ARMOREL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4702000 BLYTHEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4706000 RIVERCREST SCHOOL DISTRICT $44,713 $36,976.18
4708000 GOSNELL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4712000 MANILA SCHOOL DISTRICT $37,408 $51,504.12
4713000 OSCEOLA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4801000 BRINKLEY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4802000 CLARENDON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
4901000 CADDO HILLS SCHOOL DISTRICT $173,882 $193,313.13
4902000 MOUNT IDA SCHOOL DISTRICT $60,615 $0
5006000 PRESCOTT SCHOOL DISTRICT $4,604 $33,089.16
5008000 NEVADA SCHOOL DISTRICT $112,366 $100,549.59
5102000 JASPER SCHOOL DISTRICT $7,306 $0
5106000 DEER/MT. JUDEA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5201000 BEARDEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $16,940 $68,670.47
5204000 CAMDEN FAIRVIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $132,280 $104,887.92
5205000 HARMONY GROVE SCHOOL DISTRICT (OUACHITA) $0 $110,193.05
5301000 EAST END SCHOOL DISTRICT $1,837 $61,980.21
5303000 PERRYVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $84,942 $90,575.91
5401000 BARTON-LEXA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5403000 HELENA/W. HELENA SCHOOL DISTRICT $23,889 $41,402.16
5404000 MARVELL-ELAINE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $36,038.45
5502000 CENTERPOINT SCHOOL DISTRICT $94,327 $70,323.98
5503000 KIRBY SCHOOL DISTRICT $121,762 $139,250.59
5504000 SOUTH PIKE COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $55,604 $88,800.46
5602000 HARRISBURG SCHOOL DISTRICT $44,707 $6,735.59
5604000 MARKED TREE SCHOOL DISTRICT $22,342 $8,376.17
5605000 TRUMANN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5608000 EAST POINSETT CO. SCHOOL DISTRICT $35,952 $29,667.47
5703000 MENA SCHOOL DISTRICT $46,349 $39,446.04
5706000 OUACHITA RIVER SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5707000 COSSATOT RIVER SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $19,595.91
5801000 ATKINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5802000 DOVER SCHOOL DISTRICT $7,929 $0
5803000 HECTOR SCHOOL DISTRICT $167,840 $151,248.40
5804000 POTTSVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $10,144 $15,354.39
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
5805000 RUSSELLVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
5901000 DES ARC SCHOOL DISTRICT $86,146 $82,937.67
5903000 HAZEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $60,210 $40,300.38
6001000 LITTLE ROCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $16,978 $30,123.42
6002000 N. LITTLE ROCK SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6003000 PULASKI COUNTY SPECIAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6004000 JACKSONVILLE NORTH PULASKI SCHOOL DISTRICT $48,829 $17,459.85
6102000 MAYNARD SCHOOL DISTRICT $90,019 $61,790.34
6103000 POCAHONTAS SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $17,454.64
6201000 FORREST CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6205000 PALESTINE-WHEATLEY SCH. DISTRICT $0
6301000 BAUXITE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $50,390.07
6302000 BENTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6303000 BRYANT SCHOOL DISTRICT $19,724 $21,850.80
6304000 HARMONY GROVE SCH. DISTRICT (SALINE) $0
6401000 WALDRON SCHOOL DISTRICT $3,173 $0
6502000 SEARCY COUNTY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6505000 OZARK MOUNTAIN SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6601000 FORT SMITH SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6602000 GREENWOOD SCHOOL DISTRICT $2,521 $3,858.38
6603000 HACKETT SCHOOL DISTRICT $67,407 $70,632.72
6605000 LAVACA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
6606000 MANSFIELD SCHOOL DISTRICT $12,996 $1,850.86
6701000 DE QUEEN SCHOOL DISTRICT $43,061 $59,911.60
6703000 HORATIO SCHOOL DISTRICT $112,424 $108,668.48
6802000 CAVE CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $178,217 $122,888.93
6804000 HIGHLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $16,588 $30,681.89
6901000 MOUNTAIN VIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $22,573 $0
7001000 EL DORADO SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7003000 JUNCTION CITY SCHOOL DISTRICT $81,259 $31,696.82
7007000 PARKERS CHAPEL SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $16,741.98
7008000 SMACKOVER-NORPHLET SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7009000 STRONG-HUTTIG SCHOOL DISTRICT $64,043 $15,830.33
7102000 CLINTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $40,908 $79,675.87
7104000 SHIRLEY SCHOOL DISTRICT $49,065 $10,906.07
7105000 SOUTH SIDE SCH. DISTRICT (VAN BUREN) $0
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
7201000 ELKINS SCHOOL DISTRICT $37,129 $53,013.91
7202000 FARMINGTON SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7203000 FAYETTEVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7204000 GREENLAND SCHOOL DISTRICT $13,954 $0
7205000 LINCOLN CONSOLIDATED SCHOOL DISTRICT $30,824 $48,898.85
7206000 PRAIRIE GROVE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0 $23,917.73
7207000 SPRINGDALE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7208000 WEST FORK SCHOOL DISTRICT $37,202 $26,446.30
7301000 BALD KNOB SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7302000 BEEBE SCHOOL DISTRICT $15,706 $7,276.02
7303000 BRADFORD SCHOOL DISTRICT $41,270 $23,810.23
7304000 WHITE CO. CENTRAL SCHOOL DISTRICT $13,052 $17,630.93
7307000 RIVERVIEW SCHOOL DISTRICT $4,260 $0
7309000 PANGBURN SCHOOL DISTRICT $82,040 $73,396.72
7310000 ROSE BUD SCHOOL DISTRICT $107,353 $132,911.41
7311000 SEARCY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7401000 AUGUSTA SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7403000 MCCRORY SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7503000 DANVILLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $0
7504000 DARDANELLE SCHOOL DISTRICT $5,283 $27,379.79
7509000 WESTERN YELL CO. SCHOOL DISTRICT $42,684 $26,695.61
7510000 TWO RIVERS SCHOOL DISTRICT $86,168 $52,743.46
0440700 ARKANSAS ARTS ACADEMY $0
0442700 FOUNDERS CLASSICAL ACADEMIES OF ARKANSAS $0
0444700 ARKANSAS CONNECTIONS ACADEMY $0
0445700 HOPE ACADEMY OF NORTHWEST ARKANSAS $0
3544700 FRIENDSHIP ASPIRE ACADEMY PINE BLUFF $0
3545700 FRIENDSHIP ASPIRE ACADEMY SOUTHEAST PINE BLUFF $0
5440700 KIPP DELTA PUBLIC SCHOOLS $0 $80,232.67
6040700 ACADEMICS PLUS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOLS $0
6041700 LISA ACADEMY $0
6043700 ARKANSAS VIRTUAL ACADEMY $0
6047700 ESTEM PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL $0
6050700 ARKANSAS LIGHTHOUSE ACADEMIES $0
6052700 GRADUATE ARKANSAS CHARTER $0
6053700 RESPONSIVE ED SOLUTIONS PREMIER HIGH SCHOOL OF LITTLE ROCK $0
03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB425
6055700 EXALT ACADEMY OF SOUTHWEST LITTLE ROCK $0
6060700 SCHOLARMADE ACHIEVEMENT PLACE OF ARKANSAS $0
6061700 FRIENDSHIP ASPIRE ACADEMY LITTLE ROCK $0
6062700 RESPONSIVE ED SOLUTIONS PREMIER HIGH SCHOOL OF N. LITTLE ROCK $0
6063700 WESTWIND SCHOOL FOR PERFORMING ARTS $0
6640700 FUTURE SCHOOL OF FORT SMITH $0
7240700 HAAS HALL ACADEMY $0
7242700 RESPONSIVE ED SOLUTIONS PREMIER HIGH SCHOOL OF SPRINGDALE $0
6064700 ARKANSAS MILITARY AND FIRST RESPONDERS ACADEMY (AMFRA) $0

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that transportation funding for
public schools is an obligation of the state; that ensuring that adequate
funding is provided to public schools is a duty of the General Assembly; and
that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that funding is provided for
the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 schools years in advance of the upcoming fiscal
year so that public schools may budget accordingly. Therefore, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/J. English








03-20-2025 09:39:49 TNL281